Utah statutes.
63G-6-805.   Authority to resolve controversy between state and contractor.
The chief procurement officer, the head of a purchasing agency, or a designee
of either officer is authorized, prior to commencement of an action in court
concerning the controversy, to settle and resolve a controversy which arises
between the state and a contractor under or by virtue of a contract between
them.  This includes, without limitation, controversies based upon breach of
contract, mistakes, misrepresentation, or other cause for contract
modification or rescission.
